Utah statutes.
62A-11-410.   Violations by payor.
(1)  A payor may not discharge, refuse to hire, or discipline any obligor
because of a notice to withhold served by the office under this part, or
because of a notice or order served by an obligee in a civil action for income
withholding.
(2)  If the payor violates Subsection (1), that payor is liable to the office,
or to the obligee seeking income withholding in a civil action, for the
greater of $1,000 or the amount of child support accumulated to the date of
discharge which he should have withheld, plus interest on that amount and
costs incurred in collection of the amount from the payor, including a
reasonable attorney's fee.
